Training in complementary feeding counselling of healthcare workers and its influence on maternal behaviours and child growth: a cluster-randomized controlled trial in Lahore, Pakistan.Malnutrition is common among children aged 6-24 months in developing countries. It increases the risk of mortality. Interventions to improve infant-feeding hold the promise of reducing malnutrition among these children. A study in Brazil has shown the success of training in communication and counselling skills among health workers in improving the nutritional status of young children. Questions were raised whether the method used in the study in Brazil would also be effective when applied in other countries. The aim of the present study was to reduce growth faltering in young children through proper nutrition-promotion techniques. The objective of the study was to determine the efficacy of training health workers in nutrition counselling in enhancing their communication skills and performance, improving feeding practices, and reducing growth faltering in children aged 6-24 months. A cluster-randomized controlled trial was carried out. The method used in this study was a replica of the method in a similar study in Pelotas, Brazil. Forty health centres were paired, and one centre of each pair was randomly allocated to the intervention group, and the other to the control group. The Integrated Management of Childhood Illness (IMCI) module-'Counsel the mother'-was used for training health workers in the health centres in the intervention group. Data from 36 paired health centres and 375 mothers and their children aged 6-24 months recruited from these health centres following consultation with health workers were included in analysis. Independent observers, masked to the intervention status, examined the performance of health workers within the first month after training. Mother-child pairs were visited at home within two weeks, 45 days, and 180 days after recruitment. Information was recorded on the feeding practices, recall of the recommendations of health workers, and sociodemographic variables at these home-visits. Weight and length of the child were measured at each contact. The communication skills and consultation performance of health workers were significantly better in the intervention group than in the control group. The mothers' recall of the recommendation of health workers and reported infant-feeding practices were also significantly better in the intervention group than in the control group, even 180 days after the recruitment consultation. Growth faltering was less in the intervention group, with the largest effect observed among children in the age-group of 12 + months. These results indicate that training in IMCI feeding counselling can enhance the communication skills and performance of health workers. Improved feeding practices of counselled mothers can, in turn, reduce growth faltering in their children.Culturally appropriate nutrition education improves infant feeding and growth in rural Sichuan, China.Chinese studies indicate that the growth of rural infants and children lags behind that of their urban counterparts after 4 mo of age and that the gap is widening. However, the rural areas are home to >85% of China's 300 million children. Clearly, culturally appropriate rural complementary feeding interventions are needed to close the growth and health gaps. After a 1990 survey of infants in rural Sichuan confirmed that poor infant feeding practices rather than inadequate household food resources were responsible for the growth faltering, a year-long community-based pilot nutrition education intervention (n congruent with 250 infants each in Education and Control groups) was undertaken in four townships. The goal was to improve infant growth by improving infant feeding practices. Features of the intervention included the training and mobilizing of village nutrition educators who made monthly growth monitoring and complementary feeding counseling visits to all pregnant women and families with infants born during the intervention in the study villages. After 1 y, the Education group mothers showed significantly higher nutrition knowledge and better reported infant feeding practices than their Control group counterparts. Also, the Education group infants were significantly heavier and longer, but only at 12 mo (weight-for-age -1.17 vs. -1.93; P = 0.004; height-for-age -1.32 vs. -1.96; P = 0.022), had higher breast-feeding rates overall (83% vs. 75%; P = 0.034) and lower anemia rates (22% vs. 32%; P = 0.008) than the Control group infants. We conclude that these methods have potential for adaptation and development to other rural areas in the county, province and nation.Effects of postpartum mobile phone-based education on maternal and infant health in Ecuador.To evaluate the effects of a mobile phone-based intervention on postnatal maternal health behavior and maternal and infant health in a middle-income country.A prospective evaluation enrolled consecutive postpartum women at two public hospitals in Quito, Ecuador, between June and August 2012. Inclusion criteria were live birth, no neonatal intensive care admission, and Spanish speaking. Intervention and control groups were assigned via random number generation. The intervention included a telephone-delivered educational session and phone/text access to a nurse for 30days after delivery. Maternal and infant health indicators were recorded at delivery and 3months after delivery via chart review and written/telephone-administered survey.Overall, 102 women were assigned to the intervention group and 76 to the control group. At 3months, intervention participants were more likely to attend the infant's postnatal check-up (P=0.022) and to breastfeed exclusively (P=0.005), and less likely to feed formula (P=0.016). They used more effective forms of contraception (more implants P=0.023; fewer condoms P=0.036) and reported fewer infant illnesses (P=0.010). There were no differences in maternal acute illness or check-up attendance.Mobile phone-based postnatal patient education is a promising strategy for improving breastfeeding, contraceptive use, and infant health in low-resource settings; different strategies are needed to influence postpartum maternal health behavior.An educational intervention to promote appropriate complementary feeding practices and physical growth in infants and young children in rural Haryana, India.Complementary feeding practices are often inadequate in developing countries, resulting in a significant nutritional decline between 6 and 18 mo of age. We assessed the effectiveness of an educational intervention to promote adequate complementary feeding practices that would be feasible to sustain with existing resources. The study was a cluster randomized controlled trial in communities in the state of Haryana in India. We developed the intervention through formative research. Eight communities were pair matched on their baseline characteristics; one of each pair was randomly assigned to receive the intervention and the other to no specific feeding intervention. Health and nutrition workers in the intervention communities were trained to counsel on locally developed feeding recommendations. Newborns were enrolled in all of the communities (552 in the intervention and 473 in the control) and followed up every 3 mo to the age of 18 mo. The main outcome measures were weights and lengths at 6, 9, 12, and 18 mo and complementary feeding practices at 9 and 18 mo. All analyses were by intent to treat. In the overall analyses, there was a small but significant effect on length gain in the intervention group (difference in means 0.32 cm, 95% CI, 0.03, 0.61). The effect was greater in the subgroup of male infants (difference in mean length gain 0.51 cm, 95% CI 0.03, 0.98). Weight gain was not affected. Energy intakes from complementary foods overall were significantly higher in the intervention group children at 9 mo (mean +/- SD: 1556 +/- 1109 vs. 1025 +/- 866 kJ; P < 0.001) and 18 mo (3807 +/- 1527 vs. 2577 +/- 1058 kJ; P < 0.001). Improving complementary feeding practices through existing services is feasible but the effect on physical growth is limited. Factors that limit physical growth in such settings must be better understood to plan more effective nutrition programs.Growth faltering due to breastfeeding cessation in uninfected children born to HIV-infected mothers in Zambia.The effect of breastfeeding on growth in HIV-exposed infants is not well described.The objective was to evaluate the effect of early breastfeeding cessation on growth.In a trial conducted in Lusaka, Zambia, HIV-infected mothers were randomly assigned to exclusive breastfeeding for 4 mo followed by rapid weaning to replacement foods or exclusive breastfeeding for 6 mo followed by introduction of complementary foods and continued breastfeeding for a duration of the mother's choice. Weight-for-age z score (WAZ), length-for-age z score (LAZ), and weight-for-length z score (WLZ) and the self-reported breastfeeding practices of 593 HIV-uninfected singletons were analyzed. Generalized estimating equations were used to adjust for confounders.WAZ scores declined precipitously between 4.5 and 15 mo. The decline was slower in the breastfed infants. At 9, 12, and 15 mo, mean WAZs were, respectively, -0.74, -0.92, and -1.06 in infants who were reportedly breastfed and were -1.07, -1.20, and -1.31 in the weaned infants (P = 0.003, 0.007, and 0.02, respectively). No differences were observed past 15 mo. Breastfeeding practice was not associated with LAZ, which declined from -0.98 to -2.24 from 1 to 24 mo. After adjustment for birth weight, maternal viral load, body mass index, education, season, and marital and socioeconomic status, not breastfeeding was associated with a 0.28 decline in WAZ between 4.5 and 15 mo (P < 0.0001). During the rainy season, not breastfeeding was associated with a larger WAZ decline (0.33) than during the dry season (0.22; P for interaction = 0.02).Early growth is compromised in uninfected children born to HIV-infected Zambian mothers. Continued breastfeeding partially mitigates this effect through 15 mo. Nutritional interventions to complement breastfeeding after 6 mo are urgently needed. This trial was registered at clinicaltrials.gov as NCT00310726.Variation in outcomes of the Melbourne Infant, Feeding, Activity and Nutrition Trial (InFANT) Program according to maternal education and age.To assess the effectiveness of the Melbourne Infant Feeding, Activity and Nutrition Trial (InFANT) Program according to maternal education and age.A cluster-randomised controlled trial involving 542 mother/infant pairs from 62 existing first-time parent groups was conducted in 2008 in Melbourne, Australia. The intervention involved 6 × 2-hour dietitian-delivered sessions, DVD and written resources from infant age 4-15 months. Outcomes included infant diet (3 × 24 h diet recalls), physical activity (accelerometry), television viewing and body mass index. We tested for moderation by maternal education (with/without a University degree) and age (< 32 and ≥ 32 years). The trial was registered with the ISRCTN Register (identifier 81847050).Interaction effects with the treatment arm were observed for maternal education and age. The intervention effects on vegetable (positive effect) and sweet snack consumption (negative effect) were greater in children with higher educated mothers while intervention effects on water consumption (positive effect) were greater in infants with lower educated mothers. The intervention was also more effective in increasing both vegetable and water consumption in infants with mothers aged < 32 years.Child obesity prevention interventions may be differentially effective according to maternal education and age. Evidence of differential effects is important for informing more sensitively targeted/tailored approaches.Measuring the effects of nutritional counseling on total infant diet in a randomized controlled intervention trial.To examine the effects of nutritional counseling for the infant diet focused on complementary feeding and total diet by use of dietary scores.In a randomized controlled intervention trial, 183 mothers of full-term infants were allocated to 4 intervention groups (IG0-IG3). Intervention consisted of dietary counseling based on the food-based guidelines for infant nutrition in Germany. Counseling was done in 3 different forms: a telephone hotline (IG1), then written information (IG2), followed by additional personal telephone counseling (IG3). The IG0 group was not counseled at all. The actual diet of the infants was assessed by telephone interviews when the infants were 2, 4, 6, 9, and 12 months old and evaluated by food-based and meal-based dietary scores.Plausible, although often not statistically significant, effects of counseling were found for several single scores at various age points. Total diet during the first year of life was significantly closer to the recommendations in the most intensively counseled group than in the non-counseled and lowest-counseled groups. Telephone counseling proved to be more effective than distribution of written material.The measured effects of the innovative approach of personal telephone counseling point to the advantages of giving dietary advice to mothers of infants by means of personal contacts and suggest that positive effects on dietary habits may even be greater by face-to-face talks between mothers and experts.A randomized controlled trial of breastfeeding support and education for adolescent mothers.Despite substantial evidence of maternal and infant benefits of breastfeeding, adolescent mothers initiate breastfeeding less often and maintain breastfeeding for shorter durations when compared to their adult counterparts. A randomized controlled trial drawing on the theory of planned behavior and developmental theory was conducted to determine if an education and counseling intervention provided by a lactation consultant-peer counselor team increased breastfeeding initiation and duration up to 6 months postpartum among adolescent mothers. Study participants ( N = 289) enrolled from multiple prenatal clinic and school settings, were 15 to 18 years old, and predominately African American, single, and primiparous. The intervention, which started in the second trimester of pregnancy and extended through 4 weeks postpartum, positively influenced breastfeeding duration (p < .001) within the experimental group, but not breastfeeding initiation or exclusive breastfeeding rates. This education/support intervention was partially effective in enhancing breastfeeding outcomes. Implications for research and practice are described.Intensive nutrition education with or without supplementary feeding improves the nutritional status of moderately-malnourished children in Bangladesh.This prospective randomized trial was carried out to test the efficacy of a specific intervention for reducing the extent of their malnutrition and to change behaviour of mothers relating to child-feeding practices, care-giving, and health-seeking practices under the Bangladesh Integrated Nutrition Project (BINP). The study was conducted in rural Bangladesh among 282 moderately-malnourished (weight-for-age between 61% and 75% of median of the National Center for Health Statistics standard) children aged 6-24 months. Mothers of the first intervention group received intensive nutrition education (INE group) twice a week for three months. The second intervention group received the same nutrition education, and their children received additional supplementary feeding (INE+SF group). The comparison group received nutrition education from the community nutrition promoters twice a month according to the standard routine service of BINP. The children were observed for a further six months. After three months of interventions, a significantly higher proportion of children in the INE and INE+SF groups improved (37% and 47% respectively) from moderate to mild or normal nutrition compared to the comparison group (18%) (p < 0.001). At the end of six months of observation, the nutritional status of children in the intervention groups improved further from moderate to mild or normal nutrition compared to the comparison group (59% and 86% vs 30%, p < 0.0001). As the intensive nutrition education and supplementation given were highly effective, more children improved from moderate malnutrition to mild or normal nutritional status despite a higher incidence of morbidity. The frequency of child feeding and home-based complementary feeding improved significantly (p < 0.001) in both the intervention groups after three months of interventions and six months of observation. Body-weight gain was positively associated with age, length-for-age, weight-for-length, frequency of feeding of khichuri, egg, and potato (p < 0.05). Ability of mothers to identify malnutrition improved from 15% to 99% in the INE group and from 15% to 100% in the INE+SF group, but reduced from 24% to 21% in the comparison group. Use of separate feed pots, frequency of feeding, and cooking of additional complementary feeds improved significantly in the INE and INE+SF groups compared to the comparison group after three months of interventions and six months of observation. It can be concluded from the findings of the study that intensive nutrition education significantly improves the status of moderately-malnourished children with or without supplementary feeding.Efficacy and safety of new complementary feeding guidelines with an emphasis on red meat consumption: a randomized trial in Bogota, Colombia.Iron deficiency and poor linear growth are common in infants from deprived socioeconomic backgrounds and may be associated with inadequate complementary feeding (CF) practices.We tested the hypothesis that new CF guidelines emphasizing meat as a source of iron and zinc would improve linear growth, iron, and zinc status in infants living in poor socioeconomic circumstances in Bogota, Colombia.A total of 85 term infants who were exclusively breastfed for ≥4 mo were randomly assigned at 6 mo of age to a control group [CG (n = 43); current advice] or intervention group (new guidelines group [NGG (n = 42); with counseling to 1) continue breastfeeding, 2) offer red meat ≥3 d/wk, and 3) offer fruit and vegetables daily]). Main outcomes were 1) linear growth from 6 to 12 mo of age; 2) hemoglobin, hematocrit, iron [serum ferritin (SF)], and zinc status at 12 mo of age; and 3) meat intake at 12 mo of age (by using a food-frequency questionnaire).A total of 38 infants/group provided data at 12 mo of age. NGG infants had significantly higher red meat intake [mean ± SD: 5.4 ± 1.8 compared with 3.5 ± 1.7 d/wk at 12 mo of age; P < 0.001), higher hemoglobin and hematocrit at 12 mo of age, and a significantly greater increase in hemoglobin (mean ± SD change: 0.41 ± 0.8 compared with -0.13 ± 1.0; P = 0.01) and hematocrit (1.04 ± 2.2 compared with -0.15 ± 2.4; P = 0.03) from 6 to 12 mo of age than those in CG infants. There were no significant differences in linear growth from 6 to 12 mo of age or in SF or zinc.The new guidelines showed efficacy with higher red meat intake and positive effects on hemoglobin and hematocrit. The intervention was acceptable and affordable for most mothers. These preliminary results suggest that the intervention merits investigation in a larger cohort with longer-term follow-up. This trial was registered at http://isrctn.org as ISRCTN57733004.Long-term effectiveness of maternal dietary counseling in a low-income population: a randomized field trial.To assess the impact of dietary counseling given to mothers during the first year of infants' lives on food consumption, nutritional status, and lipid profile of the children up to 7 to 8 years old.The randomized trial was conducted with 500 mothers who gave birth to full-term infants with birth weight ≥ 2500 g between October 2001 and June 2002 in São Leopoldo, Brazil. Mothers were randomly assigned to intervention (n = 200) and control groups (n = 300) and those in the intervention group received counseling on breastfeeding and complementary feeding by 12 fieldworkers on 10 home visits during the first year of children's lives. Blinded fieldworkers assessed dietary and anthropometric data at 12 to 16 months, 3 to 4 years, and 7 to 8 years and lipid profiles at 3 to 4 years and 7 to 8 years old. The lipid profile was the primary outcome.Of the 500 recruited children, 397 underwent the 12- to 16-month, 354 the 3- to 4-year, and 315 the 7- to 8-year assessment. The energy-dense foods intake was significantly lower in the intervention group at 12 to 16 months and 3 to 4 years old. At 3 to 4 years, serum lipid levels did not differ between groups. At 7 to 8 years, high-density lipoprotein levels were 0.11 mmol/L higher (0.00 to 0.20), and triglycerides concentration was 0.13 mmol/L lower (-0.25 to -0.01) in intervention children but only among the girls. Overweight/obesity rates did not differ between groups.Dietary counseling for mothers during infancy decreased the energy-dense foods consumption and improved lipid profile.Effectiveness of an early intervention on infant feeding practices and "tummy time": a randomized controlled trial.To assess the effectiveness of a home-based early intervention on infant feeding practices and "tummy time" for infants in the first year of life.Randomized controlled trial with follow-up measures scheduled at 6 and 12 months.Socially and economically disadvantaged areas of Sydney, Australia.We recruited 667 first-time mothers and their infants in 2007 and 2008.The intervention consisted of 5 or 6 home visits from a specially trained research nurse delivering a staged home-based intervention in the antenatal period and at 1, 3, 5, 9, and 12 months.Changes in infant feeding practices and "tummy time."The intervention group had a significantly higher median duration of breastfeeding at 12 months than the control group (17 weeks [95% confidence interval, 13.9-20.4 weeks] vs 13 weeks [95% confidence interval, 10.1-15.0 weeks]; P = .03). Compared with the control group, the hazard ratio for stopping breastfeeding in the intervention group was 0.82 (95% confidence interval, 0.68-0.99). The intervention also resulted in a significantly later introduction of solid foods (P < .001 for trend), reducing the proportion of mothers who introduced solids before 6 months by 12% (95% confidence interval, 4%-20%) from 74% to 62%. The intervention also decreased the age at which infants started tummy time (P = .03 for trend) and increased the daily practice of tummy time by 7% from 76% to 83% (P = .05).The home-based early intervention delivered by trained community nurses significantly improved some infant feeding practices and resulted in earlier daily practice of tummy time.anzctr.org.au Identifier: ACTRN012607000168459.Breastfeeding and complementary food: randomized trial of community doula home visiting.Despite recent efforts to increase breastfeeding, young African American mothers continue to breastfeed at low rates, and commonly introduce complementary foods earlier than recommended. This study examines the effects of a community doula home visiting intervention on infant feeding practices among young mothers.Low-income, African American mothers (n = 248) under age 22 years participated in a randomized trial of a community doula intervention. Intervention-group mothers received services from paraprofessional doulas: specialized home visitors trained as childbirth educators and lactation counselors. Doulas provided home visits from pregnancy through 3 months postpartum, and support during childbirth. Control-group mothers received usual prenatal care. Data were obtained from medical records and maternal interviews at birth and 4 months postpartum.Intent-to-treat analyses showed that doula-group mothers attempted breastfeeding at a higher rate than control-group mothers (64% vs 50%; P = .02) and were more likely to breastfeed longer than 6 weeks (29% vs 17%; P = .04), although few mothers still breastfed at 4 months. The intervention also impacted mothers' cereal/solid food introduction (P = .008): fewer doula-group mothers introduced complementary foods before 6 weeks of age (6% vs 18%), while more waited until at least 4 months (21% vs 13%) compared with control-group mothers.Community doulas may be effective in helping young mothers meet breastfeeding and healthy feeding guidelines. The intervention's success may lie in the relationship that develops between doula and mother based on shared cultural background and months of prenatal home visiting, and the doula's presence at the birth, where she supports early breastfeeding experiences.Nutrition education and introduction of broad bean-based complementary food improves knowledge and dietary practices of caregivers and nutritional status of their young children in Hula, Ethiopia.Nutritious complementary foods are needed in countries where undernutrition and stunting are major problems, but mothers may be reluctant to change from traditional gruels.To test whether a recipe-based complementary feeding education intervention would improve knowledge and practice of mothers with young children in Hula, Ethiopia.A baseline survey of 200 eligible, randomly selected mother-child pairs gathered data on sociodemographic characteristics, food security status, knowledge and practices concerning complementary feeding, food group intakes of children aged 6 to 23 months by 24-hour recalls, and children's anthropometric measurements. Twice a month for 6 months, women in the intervention group received an education session consisting of eight specific messages using Alive and Thrive posters and a demonstration and tasting of a local barley and maize porridge recipe containing 30% broad beans. The control group lived in a different area and had no intervention.At 6 months, knowledge and practice scores regarding complementary feeding were significantly improved (p < .001) in the intervention group but not in the control group. The intervention resulted in improvement of children's dietary diversity, as well as mean intake of energy and selected nutrients, compared with children in the control group. Changes in height and weight did not differ between the two groups.Community-based nutrition education over 6 months that included demonstration of a local porridge recipe with broad beans added improved the complementary feeding practices of caregivers and the nutritional status of their young children.Combining Intensive Counseling by Frontline Workers with a Nationwide Mass Media Campaign Has Large Differential Impacts on Complementary Feeding Practices but Not on Child Growth: Results of a Cluster-Randomized Program Evaluation in Bangladesh.Complementary feeding (CF) contributes to child growth and development, but few CF programs are delivered at scale. Alive & Thrive addressed this in Bangladesh through intensified interpersonal counseling (IPC), mass media (MM), and community mobilization (CM).The objective was to evaluate the impact of providing IPC + MM + CM (intensive) compared with standard nutrition counseling + less intensive MM + CM (nonintensive) on CF practices and anthropometric measurements.We used a cluster-randomized, nonblinded evaluation with cross-sectional surveys [n = ∼600 and 1090 children 6-23.9 mo and 24-47.9 mo/group, respectively, at baseline (2010) and n = ∼500 and 1100 children of the same age, respectively, at endline (2014)]. We derived difference-in-difference impact estimates (DDEs), adjusting for geographic clustering, infant age, sex, differences in baseline characteristics, and differential change in characteristics over time.Groups were similar at baseline. CF improvements were significantly greater in the intensive than in the nonintensive group [DDEs: 16.3, 14.7, 22.0, and 24.6 percentage points (pp) for minimum dietary diversity, minimum meal frequency, minimum acceptable diet, and consumption of iron-rich foods, respectively]. In the intensive group, CF practices were high: 50.4% for minimum acceptable diet, 63.8% for minimum diet diversity, 75.1% for minimum meal frequency, and 78.5% for consumption of iron-rich foods. Timely introduction of foods improved. Significant, nondifferential stunting declines occurred in intensive (6.2 pp) and nonintensive (5.2 pp) groups in children 24-47.9 mo.The intensive program substantially improved CF practices compared with the nonintensive program. Large-scale program delivery was feasible and, with the use of multiple platforms, reached 1.7 million households. Nondifferential impacts on stunting were likely due to rapid positive secular trends in Bangladesh. Accelerating linear growth further could require accompanying interventions. This study establishes proof of concept for large-scale behavior change interventions to improve child feeding. This trial was registered at clinicaltrials.gov as NCT01678716.Prevention of malnutrition among young children in rural Bangladesh by a food-health-care educational intervention: a randomized, controlled trial.As a result of inappropriate feeding, poor health and hygiene, and poor caring practices, the nutritional status of many young infants deteriorates with advancing age.To explore the effectiveness of a nutrition education package to prevent malnutrition among young children.A community-based, randomized, controlled trial was conducted among 605 normal and mildly malnourished children aged 6 to 9 months in 121 Community Nutrition Centers (CNCs) of the Bangladesh Integrated Nutrition Project (BINP) in four regions of Bangladesh from 2000 to 2002. The intervention group received weekly nutrition education based on the nutrition triangle concept of UNICEF for 6 months, whereas the control group received regular BINP services. Both groups were observed for a further 6 months to assess the sustainability of the effects. Information on socioeconomic status, feeding patterns, morbidity, and anthropometric features was collected.A significant increase in the frequency of complementary feeding was observed in the intervention group as compared with the control group, and the increase was sustained throughout the observation period. The intervention group had a higher weight gain than the control group after the end of the intervention (0.86 vs. 0.77 kg, p = 0.053) and after the end of the observation period (1.81 vs. 1.39 kg, p < .001). The proportion of normal and mildly malnourished children was greater in the intervention group than in the control group after the end of the observations (88.9% vs. 61.5%, p < .001). Nutrition education successfully prevented malnutrition in all the areas. Variation in the outcome of nutrition education among the regions was observed.This culturally appropriate nutrition education package based on the nutrition triangle model effectively prevented growth faltering and malnutrition among young children.Application of the Health Belief Model to Teach Complementary Feeding Messages in Ethiopia.In Ethiopia many women do not practice appropriate complementary feeding (CF). The Health Belief Model (HBM) asserts that change in behavior is determined after consideration of severity, benefit, and barriers to change. This study examined the effectiveness of 3 months of HBM-based education compared to the traditional (didactic) method on CF practices of mothers, with no education as control, using three randomized groups. One hundred sixty-six mother-infant (6-18 months) pairs were recruited. At baseline and after intervention, knowledge, perceptions, and practices about CF and related areas were determined. It was only diet diversity that increased significantly in the HBM group (from 3.05±0.94 food groups to 3.79±0.82, p<.05) while the other two groups had no change. Improvements in food groups were most noticeable as legumes & nuts (from 35.6% use to 83.9% in HBM group). Thus, nutrition education about diet diversity improvement needs to be conducted promotes behavior change.Effect of a Baby-Led Approach to Complementary Feeding on Infant Growth and Overweight: A Randomized Clinical Trial.Baby-led approaches to complementary feeding, which promote self-feeding of all nonliquid foods are proposed to improve energy self-regulation and lower obesity risk. However, to date, no randomized clinical trials have studied this proposition.To determine whether a baby-led approach to complementary feeding results in a lower body mass index (BMI) than traditional spoon-feeding.The 2-year Baby-Led Introduction to Solids (BLISS) randomized clinical trial recruited 206 women (168 [81.6%] of European ancestry; 85 [41.3%] primiparous) in late pregnancy from December 19, 2012, through March 17, 2014, as part of a community intervention in Dunedin, New Zealand. Women were randomized to a control condition (n = 101) or the BLISS intervention (n = 105) after stratification for parity and education. All outcomes were collected by staff blinded to group randomization, and no participants withdrew because of an adverse event. Data were analyzed based on intention to treat.Mothers in the BLISS group received lactation consultant support (≥5 contacts) to extend exclusive breastfeeding and delay introduction of complementary foods until 6 months of age and 3 personalized face-to-face contacts (at 5.5, 7.0, and 9.0 months).The primary outcome was BMI z score (at 12 and 24 months). Secondary outcomes included energy self-regulation and eating behaviors assessed with questionnaires at 6, 12, and 24 months and energy intake assessed with 3-day weighed diet records at 7, 12, and 24 months.Among the 206 participants (mean [SD] age, 31.3 [5.6] years), 166 were available for analysis at 24 months (retention, 80.5%). The mean (SD) BMI z score was not significantly different at 12 months (control group, 0.20 [0.89]; BLISS group, 0.44 [1.13]; adjusted difference, 0.21; 95% CI, -0.07 to 0.48) or at 24 months (control group, 0.24 [1.01]; BLISS group, 0.39 [1.04]; adjusted difference, 0.16; 95% CI, -0.13 to 0.45). At 24 months, 5 of 78 infants (6.4%) were overweight (BMI≥95th percentile) in the control group compared with 9 of 87 (10.3%) in the BLISS group (relative risk, 1.8; 95% CI, 0.6-5.7). Lower satiety responsiveness was observed in BLISS infants at 24 months (adjusted difference, -0.24; 95% CI, -0.41 to -0.07). Parents also reported less food fussiness (adjusted difference, -0.33; 95% CI, -0.51 to -0.14) and greater enjoyment of food (adjusted difference, 0.25; 95% CI, 0.07 to 0.43) at 12 months in BLISS infants. Estimated differences in energy intake were 55 kJ (95% CI, -284 to 395 kJ) at 12 months and 143 kJ (95% CI, -241 to 526 kJ) at 24 months.A baby-led approach to complementary feeding did not result in more appropriate BMI than traditional spoon-feeding, although children were reported to have less food fussiness. Further research should determine whether these findings apply to individuals using unmodified baby-led weaning.http://anzctr.org.au Identifier: ACTRN12612001133820.Effect of an integrated child nutrition intervention on the complementary food intake of young children in rural north Viet Nam.Forty-two percent of Vietnamese children are stunted by two years of age. Since 1990, Save the Children Federation/US (SC) has implemented integrated nutrition programs targeting young children. We evaluated the effect of SC's nutrition program on the complementary food intake of young rural Vietnamese children. Using a longitudinal, prospective, randomized design, we followed 238 children (119 each from intervention and comparison communes) age 5 to 25 months old for six months with a re-survey at 12 months. We gathered 24-hour recall data at baseline and at months 2, 4, 6, and 12. Dietary energy intake was calculated using the 1972 Vietnamese food composition table. Key outcomes were daily frequency of consuming intervention-promoted food and non-breastmilk liquids and food, daily quantity of non-breastmilk liquids and food consumed, daily energy intake, and proportion of children meeting daily median energy requirements. Young rural children exposed to SC's program consumed intervention-promoted, and any, foods more frequently, ate a greater quantity of any food, consumed more energy, and were more likely to meet their daily energy requirements than comparison children. Some effects were only observed during the intensive intervention period; others persisted into or were evident only at the 12-month follow-up, approximately four months after program completion. Based on the mothers' reports, the intervention did not apparently compromise breastfeeding prevalence or frequency. The intervention improved children's food and energy intake and protected them from declining as rapidly as comparison children in meeting their energy requirements.The effectiveness of nutrition education: Applying the Health Belief Model in child-feeding practices to use pulses for complementary feeding in Southern Ethiopia.Complementary foods (CFs) in Ethiopia are cereal based and adding locally grown pulses (legumes) to CF would provide needed nutrients. To assess the effects of nutrition education (NEd) using Health Belief Model (HBM) in promoting pulses for CF, a 6-month quasi-experimental study was conducted in 160 mother-child pairs. Knowledge, attitude, and practice (KAP) questions were given to mothers at baseline, midline, and endline, along with anthropometric measurements of children. NEd involving discussions and recipe demonstrations was given twice monthly for 6 months to the intervention group (n = 80) while control mothers received usual education. At baseline, mothers' KAP scores were low at both sites; at 3 and 6 months of NEd, mean KAP scores of mothers increased (p < 0.05) compared to the control site. Significant improvements in children's mean weight, weight for height, and weight for age occurred in the intervention site only. Nutritional status of children improved after providing mothers with pulse-based NEd. Educational intervention to improve adherence to the Mediterranean diet among parents and their children aged 1-2 years. EniM clinical trial.The objective of the present study was to evaluate the effectiveness of an educational programme on healthy alimentation, carried out in day-care centres and aimed at the parents of children from 1 to 2 years of age, regarding the acquisition of healthy eating habits among themselves and their children.We performed a multicentre, multidisciplinary, randomized controlled study in a community setting.The EniM study (nutritional intervention study among children from Mataró) was performed in twelve day-care centres in Mataró (Spain). Centres were randomized into a control group (CG) and an intervention group (IG). IG received four or five educational workshops on diet, CG did not have workshops.Children, not exclusively breast-fed, from 1 to 2 years of age, in the participating day-care centres and the persons responsible for their alimentation (mother or father).Thirty-five per cent of the IG did not attend the minimum of three workshops and were excluded. The CG included seventy-four children and seventy-two parents and the IG seventy-five children and sixty-seven parents. Both groups were comparable at baseline. Basal adherence to the Mediterranean diet was 56·4 % in parents (Gerber index) and 7·7 points in children (Kidmed test). At 8 months, Mediterranean diet adherence had improved in the IG by 5·8 points in the Gerber index (P=0·01) and 0·6 points in the Kidmed test (P=0·02) compared with the CG.This educational intervention performed in parents at the key period of incorporation of a 1-2-year-old child to the family table showed significant increases in adherence of the parents to the Mediterranean diet, suggesting future improvement in different indicators of health and an expected influence on the diet of their children.[Impacts of the 10 Steps to Healthy Feeding in Infants: a randomized field trial].This study assesses the impact of an intervention known as the Ten Steps to Healthy Feeding: A Nutritional Guide for Children under Two on nutritional conditions and infant health in low-income families. Two hundred newborns were randomized to the intervention group and three hundred to the control group. Parents of the intervention group received nutritional orientation during the child's first year of life. Both groups received visits at 6 and 12 months and routine follow-up by their pediatricians. The results (n = 397) showed that the intervention was associated with a higher proportion of exclusive breastfeeding at 4 months (RR = 1.58; 95%CI: 1.21-2.06) and 6 months (RR = 2.34; 95%CI: 1.37-3.99) and breastfeeding at 12 months (RR = 1.26; 95%CI: 1.02-1.55) and a lower proportion of children with diarrhea (RR = 0.68; 95%CI: 0.51-0.90), respiratory problems (RR = 0.63; 95%CI: 0.46-0.85), use of medication (RR = 0.56; 95%CI: 0.34-0.91), and dental caries (RR = 0.56; 95%CI: 0.32-0.96) in the 12-16 month bracket. The intervention had no effect on the occurrence of anemia, hospitalization, or nutritional status. The results suggest that the nutritional orientation program led to positive changes in infant feeding practices and health conditions, but that it was insufficient to prevent iron deficiency anemia.A Nutrition Education Program in Rural Bangladesh Was Associated with Improved Feeding Practices but Not with Child Growth. The impact of systematic dietary counseling during the first year of life on prevalence rates of anemia and iron deficiency at 12-16 months.To evaluate the impact that a program based on maternal dietary counseling covering breastfeeding and healthy complementary feeding had on the prevalence of iron deficiency, anemia and iron deficiency anemia in children aged 12 to 16 months.Newborn infants were randomized at birth to an intervention or a control group. Mothers in the intervention group received home visits during the children's first year of life on a monthly basis up to 6 months, and at 8, 10 and 12 months. The mothers in the control group received visits for data collection when children reached 6 and 12 months. All children were visited at ages between 12 and 16 months and 24-hour dietary recalls and hemoglobin and ferritin tests were conducted.There was no evidence that the intervention had an effect on anemia incidence, which was 66.5% in the intervention group and 61.8% in the control group. There was also no evidence of any difference between the groups in the prevalence of iron deficiency anemia or of iron deficiency. However, a higher percentage of children in the intervention group were exclusively breastfed at 4 and 6 months, and breastfed at 6 and 12 months. Intervention group children also consumed more meat and were fed diets with better iron bioavailability and consumed less cow's milk and calcium than children from the control group.This intervention had no effect on the prevalence of anemia, iron deficiency or iron deficiency anemia. Clinical trial registry identification number: NCT00629629.Lactation Consultant Support from Late Pregnancy with an Educational Intervention at 4 Months of Age Delays the Introduction of Complementary Foods in a Randomized Controlled Trial.Although the WHO recommends that complementary feeding in infants should begin at 6 mo of age, it often begins before this in developed countries.Our objective was to determine whether lactation consultant (LC) support, with educational resources given at 4-mo postpartum, can delay the introduction of complementary foods until around 6 mo of age.A total of 802 mother-infant pairs were recruited from the single maternity hospital serving Dunedin, New Zealand (59% response rate) and randomly assigned to the following: 1) usual care (control group); 2) infant sleep education intervention (Sleep); 3) food, activity, and breastfeeding intervention (FAB); or 4) combination (both) intervention (Combo). Certified LCs delivered 3 intervention sessions (late pregnancy and 1-wk and 4-mo postpartum). The 4-mo contact used educational resources focused on developmental readiness for complementary foods. Age when complementary foods were introduced was obtained from repeated interviews (monthly from 3- to 27-wk postpartum).A total of 49.5% and 87.2% of infants received complementary foods before 5 and 6 mo of age, respectively. There was evidence of group differences in the number of infants introduced to complementary foods before 5 mo (P = 0.006), with those receiving support and resources (FAB and Combo groups combined; 55.6%) more likely to wait until at least 5 mo compared with controls (control and Sleep groups combined; 43.3%) (OR: 1.52; 95% CI: 1.08, 2.16). However, there was no evidence they were more likely to wait until 6 mo of age (P = 0.52). Higher maternal age, higher parity, and a less positive attitude toward breastfeeding were positively associated, and drinking alcohol during pregnancy was negatively associated, with later age of introduction of complementary foods.Providing an LC and educational resources at 4-mo postpartum to predominantly well-educated, mainly European, women can delay the introduction of complementary foods until 5 mo of age, but not until the WHO recommendation of 6 mo. This trial was registered at clinicaltrials.gov as NCT00892983.Positive impact of child feeding training program for primary care health professionals: a cluster randomized field trial.To assess the impact of a child feeding training program for primary care health professionals about breastfeeding and complementary feeding practices.Cluster-randomized field trial conducted in the city of Porto Alegre, (RS), Brazil. Twenty primary health care centers (HCC) were randomized into intervention (n = 9) and control (n = 11) groups. The health professionals (n = 200) at the intervention group centers received training about healthy feeding practices. Pregnant women were enrolled at the study. Up to six months of child's age, home visits were made to obtain variables related to breastfeeding and introduction of foods.619 children were evaluated: 318 from the intervention group and 301 from the control group. Exclusive breastfeeding prevalence in the first (72.3 versus 59.4%; RR = 1.21; 95%CI 1.08 - 1.38), second (62.6 versus 48.2%; RR = 1.29; 95%CI 1.10 - 1.53), and third months of life (44.0% versus 34.6%; RR = 1.27; 95%CI 1.04 - 1.56) was higher in the intervention group compared to the control group. The prevalence of children who consumed meat four or five times per week was higher in the intervention group than in the control group (36.8 versus 22.6%; RR = 1.62; 95%CI 1.32 - 2.03). The prevalence of children who had consumed soft drinks (34.9 versus 52.5%; RR = 0.66; 95%CI 0.54 - 0.80), chocolate (24.5 versus 36.7% RR = 0.66 95%CI 0.53 - 0.83), petit suisse (68.9 versus 79.7; 95%CI 0.75 - 0.98) and coffee (10.4 versus 20.1%; RR = 0.51; 95%CI 0.31 - 0.85) in their six first months of life was lower in the intervention group.The training of health professionals had a positive impact on infant feeding practices, contributing to the promotion of child health.Adherence to dietary recommendations for preschoolers: clinical trial with teenage mothers.To assess the effect of educational dietary intervention offered in the child's first year of life, as well as teenage mothers and grandmothers in carrying out the dietary recommendations at four to seven years.Randomized clinical trial initiated in 2006, in Porto Alegre, RS, involving 323 teenage mothers and grandmothers who cohabited. The intervention consisted of six counseling sessions on breastfeeding and healthy complementary feeding. The first session occurred in the maternity ward and the other ones in the households of mothers at seven, 15, 30, 60, and 120 days of the child's life. The information about the child's diet were obtained on a monthly basis in the first six months, every two months in the second half-year, and at four to seven years, using a food frequency questionnaire. To assess the adequacy of food consumption to the recommendations from the Ministry of Health, we elaborated a score system that would reflect the compliance with the Ten Steps for Healthy Toddlers from 2 to 10 Years. The average scores of intervention and control groups were compared using the t-test.Low adherence to recommendations on child nutrition was found in the study population, with no difference in implementation the steps between the groups. The score on the compliance with the steps was similar in both groups (9.6 [SD = 1.63] and 9.3 [SD = 1.60] in the intervention and control groups, respectively) and no influence of the cohabitation with the grandmother was found.Educational dietary intervention in the first four months of the child's life for teenage mothers and grandmothers had no effect on the compliance with the recommendations at four to seven years of the child's life.Avaliar o efeito de intervenção alimentar educativa oferecida, no primeiro ano de vida da criança, a mães adolescentes e avós maternas, no cumprimento das recomendações alimentares aos quatro a sete anos.Ensaio clínico randomizado iniciado em 2006, em Porto Alegre, RS, envolvendo 323 mães adolescentes e avós maternas, quando em coabitação. A intervenção consistiu em seis sessões de aconselhamento sobre aleitamento materno e alimentação complementar saudável. A primeira sessão ocorreu na maternidade e as demais, nos domicílios das mães aos sete, 15, 30, 60 e 120 dias de vida da criança. As informações sobre alimentação da criança foram obtidas mensalmente nos primeiros seis meses de vida, a cada dois meses no segundo semestre, e aos quatro a sete anos, por meio de questionário de frequência alimentar. Para avaliar a adequação do consumo alimentar às recomendações do Ministério da Saúde, elaborou-se um sistema de escore que refletisse o cumprimento dos Dez Passos Para Uma Alimentação Saudável Para Crianças de 2 a 10 Anos. As médias dos escores dos grupos intervenção e controle foram comparadas por meio do teste t.Houve baixa adesão às recomendações sobre alimentação infantil na população estudada, sem diferença no cumprimento dos passos entre os grupos. O escore relativo ao cumprimento dos passos foi semelhante nos dois grupos (9,6 [DP = 1,63] e 9,3 [DP = 1,60] nos grupos intervenção e controle, respectivamente) e não houve influência da coabitação com a avó materna.Intervenção alimentar educativa nos primeiros quatro meses de vida da criança para mães adolescentes e avós maternas não teve efeito no cumprimento das recomendações alimentares aos quatro a sete anos de vida.[The impact of health workers' training on breastfeeding and complementary feeding practices].This study aimed to evaluate the impact on feeding practices for infants (<1 year of age) resulting from update training for health workers in the Ten Steps to Healthy Feeding of Children Under Two. Health Care Centers (HCC) in Porto Alegre, Rio Grande do Sul State, Brazil, were randomized into a control group (n=11) and an intervention group (n=9). Health centers organized according to Brazil's Family Health Program (FHP) were included as an intervention cluster (n=12). Infant feeding practices were evaluated at the health centers at 6 months (n=918) and again at 12 months of age (n=799). The results showed that mean duration of exclusive breastfeeding was significantly longer in the two groups that received the intervention (2.56±1.91 months in the FHP intervention and 2.32±1.63 months in the HCC intervention) compared to the HCC control group (1.91±1.60 months). There was a positive impact on the quality of complementary feeding of infants treated at the health centers that participated in the intervention, especially those with the FHP.[Influence of follow-up education of mothers about too early introduction of solid food to infants].We developed a program intended to modify maternal attitudes towards feeding in order to delay the introduction of solids to infants until they are 2 months of age. The program was provided by nurses using an individualized, educational approach. To evaluate its efficacy, a randomized trial design was used. The results in the 2 groups were comparable. The educational trial's lack of success when compared to others and the reasons for this are discussed.An exploratory trial of parental advice for increasing vegetable acceptance in infancy.Research suggests that repeatedly offering infants a variety of vegetables during weaning increases vegetable intake and liking. The effect may extend to novel foods. The present study aimed to investigate the impact of advising parents to introduce a variety of single vegetables as first foods on infants' subsequent acceptance of a novel vegetable. Mothers of 4- to 6-month-old infants in the UK, Greece and Portugal were randomised to either an intervention group (n 75), who received guidance on introducing five vegetables (one per d) as first foods repeated over 15 d, or a control group (n 71) who received country-specific 'usual care'. Infant's consumption (g) and liking (maternal and researcher rated) of an unfamiliar vegetable were assessed 1 month post-intervention. Primary analyses were conducted for the full sample with secondary analyses conducted separately by country. No significant effect of the intervention was found for vegetable intake in the three countries combined. However, sub-group analyses showed that UK intervention infants consumed significantly more novel vegetable than control infants (32.8 (SD 23.6) v. 16.5 (sd 12.1) g; P =0.003). UK mothers and researchers rated infants' vegetable liking higher in the intervention than in control condition. In Portugal and Greece, there was no significant intervention effect on infants' vegetable intake or liking. The differing outcome between countries possibly reflects cultural variations in existing weaning practices. However, the UK results suggest in countries where vegetables are not common first foods, advice on introducing a variety of vegetables early in weaning may be beneficial for increasing vegetable acceptance.Evaluation of the impact of weaning food messages on infant feeding practices and child growth in rural Bangladesh.In rural Bangladesh, a community-based weaning intervention used volunteers to teach complementary feeding to families of 62 breast-fed infants aged 6-12 mo. Over 5 mo, treatment children gained on average 0.46 SD (approximately 460 g) more in weight-for-age (WAZ) than the 55 control subjects, and were approximately 0.5 kg heavier at the final measure. The differences were statistically significant (P < 0.001). The percent median weight-for-age (WAPM) of treatment children held steady at 76% of the National Center for Health Statistics' reference, whereas the WAPM of control subjects dropped from 78% to 72%. The increase in percentage points of severe malnutrition (below -3 WAZ) was only 5% in the treatment group compared with 26% in the control subjects. Treatment children consumed a significantly greater percent of their energy and protein requirements from complementary foods than did control subjects. The affordable complementary foods consisted mainly of cereal porridge with oil and brown sugar. These findings suggest that educational interventions teaching families to feed hygienic, simple, cheap, energy-enriched complementary foods to breast-fed infants after 5-6 mo can improve child growth, even under impoverished conditions.A parent-focused intervention to reduce infant obesity risk behaviors: a randomized trial.To assess the effectiveness of a parent-focused intervention on infants' obesity-risk behaviors and BMI.This cluster randomized controlled trial recruited 542 parents and their infants (mean age 3.8 months at baseline) from 62 first-time parent groups. Parents were offered six 2-hour dietitian-delivered sessions over 15 months focusing on parental knowledge, skills, and social support around infant feeding, diet, physical activity, and television viewing. Control group parents received 6 newsletters on nonobesity-focused themes; all parents received usual care from child health nurses. The primary outcomes of interest were child diet (3 × 24-hour diet recalls), child physical activity (accelerometry), and child TV viewing (parent report). Secondary outcomes included BMI z-scores (measured). Data were collected when children were 4, 9, and 20 months of age.Unadjusted analyses showed that, compared with controls, intervention group children consumed fewer grams of noncore drinks (mean difference = -4.45; 95% confidence interval [CI]: -7.92 to -0.99; P = .01) and were less likely to consume any noncore drinks (odds ratio = 0.48; 95% CI: 0.24 to 0.95; P = .034) midintervention (mean age 9 months). At intervention conclusion (mean age 19.8 months), intervention group children consumed fewer grams of sweet snacks (mean difference = -3.69; 95% CI: -6.41 to -0.96; P = .008) and viewed fewer daily minutes of television (mean difference = -15.97: 95% CI: -25.97 to -5.96; P = .002). There was little statistical evidence of differences in fruit, vegetable, savory snack, or water consumption or in BMI z-scores or physical activity.This intervention resulted in reductions in sweet snack consumption and television viewing in 20-month-old children.INSIGHT responsive parenting intervention is associated with healthier patterns of dietary exposures in infants.To determine whether a responsive parenting (RP) intervention affects infant dietary patterns.Primiparous mother-newborn dyads (n = 291) were randomized to the Intervention Nurses Start Infants Growing on Healthy Trajectories (INSIGHT) RP intervention or control. Curricula were delivered at nurse home visits at ages 3, 16, 28, and 40 weeks. RP group feeding guidance advised responsive feeding, delayed introduction of solids, repeated exposure to novel foods, and age-appropriate portion sizes. Latent class analysis identified patterns of dietary exposure at 9 months. Class membership at 9 months was used to predict BMI percentile at 2 years.Five dietary patterns were identified: "Breastfed, Fruits and Vegetables," "Breastfed, Low Variety," "Formula, Fruits and Vegetables," "Formula, Low Variety," and "Formula, High Energy Density." Over 60% of infants had patterns low in fruits and vegetables or high in energy-dense foods. RP group infants were less likely than control to be in the "Formula, Low Variety" class (OR = 0.40, 95% CI 0.23-0.71) or "Formula, High Energy Density" class (OR = 0.28, 95% CI 0.12-0.61) relative to the "Formula, Fruits and Vegetables" class. Dietary pattern at 9 months was significantly associated with BMI percentile at 2 years.While a majority of infants consumed diets low in fruits and vegetables, the INSIGHT RP intervention was associated with healthier dietary patterns.Maternal dietary counseling reduces consumption of energy-dense foods among infants: a randomized controlled trial.To evaluate the impact of a dietary counseling in reducing the intake of energy-dense foods by infants.A randomized controlled trial.São Leopoldo, Brazil. Mothers and infants of a low-income-group population were randomized into intervention (n = 163) and received dietary counseling during 10 home visits, or control (n = 234) groups.Child consumption of sugar-dense (SD) and lipid-dense (LD) foods at 12 to 16 months.The effect of the intervention was expressed by relative risks and 95% confidence intervals. Poisson regression analysis was used to determine the association between exclusive breastfeeding and the energy-dense foods intake.A smaller proportion of infants from the intervention group consumed candy, soft drinks, honey, cookies, chocolate, and salty snacks. In the intervention group, there was a reduction of 40% and 50% in the proportion of infants who consumed LD and SD foods, respectively. Being breastfed up to 6 months reduced the risk for consumption of LD and SD foods by 58% and 67%, respectively.Dietary counseling to mothers may be effective in reducing the consumption of energy-dense foods among infants, and it is helpful in improving early dietary habits.Nutrition education linked to agricultural interventions improved child dietary diversity in rural Cambodia.Poor infant and young child feeding (IYCF) practices are major determinants of chronic malnutrition. The main objective of this study was to assess the impact of a nutrition education (NE) programme aimed at promoting improved IYCF behaviours in combination with an agriculture intervention on children's dietary diversity and nutritional status. From 2012 to 2014, a cluster randomised trial was rolled out in Cambodia in the context of an agriculture and nutrition project of the FAO of the UN. The cross-sectional baseline study was carried out in sixteen pre-selected communes in 2012. Restricted randomisation allotted the communes to either intervention (NE and agriculture intervention) or comparison arms (agriculture intervention only). The impact survey was conducted as a census in all FAO project villages in 2014. Caregivers of children aged 0-23 months were interviewed using standardised questions on socio-economic status and dietary diversity (24-h recall). Anthropometric measurements were taken. A difference-in-differences model was applied. The sample comprised 743 households with children ≥6 months of age at baseline and 921 at impact. After 1 year of NE, 69 % of the intervention households reported to have participated in the NE. Estimated mean child dietary diversity was significantly different at impact between comparison and intervention (3·6 and 3·9, respectively). In particular, the consumption of pro-vitamin A-rich foods and other fruits and vegetables increased. No treatment effects on height-for-age Z-scores could be shown. NE led to improvements in children's diets. For effects on growth, it is assumed that longer NE activities are required to achieve sustainable behaviour change of age-appropriate infant feeding.An educational intervention on promotion of breast feeding complemented by continuing support.The study, aiming to document the effect of continued support for mothers on frequency of exclusive breast feeding, was carried out by inclusion of breast feeding counselling in the context of well-baby care. One hundred and forty-six mothers who had been exposed to two educational sessions on breast feeding after delivery were given appointments to bring their baby to the paediatric hospital for well-baby care. The mother-infant pairs were followed by the same two residents for 4 months. Mean number of visits was six. A conscious effort was made during all visits to influence the mothers and their close relatives towards exclusive breast feeding. It was observed that in a large proportion of the infants, breast milk was being supplemented with water at the time of the first visit and no further effort was made to change this traditional behaviour. Comparison of the results with a group of mothers who had been exposed to similar educational sessions after delivery but without further support showed a striking increase in frequency of exclusive breast feeding (breast milk and water) in the supported group.Researchers enrolled at least 96 primiparous women infant pairs in Instanbul, Turkey into a study intended to examine the effect of continued support of mothers on an educational model to promote exclusive breast feeding. Both the study group and the control group were exposed to the same educational sessions on breast feeding. The mothers received an appointment card during the 1st home visit for a follow up visit at the University Children's Hospital at 2 weeks. The same physician saw the same group of infants monthly for 4 months. The physicians discussed breast feeding and infant feeding with mother for 5-15 minutes. Further they encouraged mothers to telephone or visit whenever a problem occurred. They also suggested bringing a close family member with them, especially the mother in law. Indeed close relatives accompanied mothers on 90% of the visits. The deeply rooted tradition of supplementing breast milk with water manifested itself in 47.9% of the cases at 1 week. Since this was so deeply rooted, the researchers considered breast milk and water as exclusive breast feeding. 85.4% of the study group practiced exclusive breast feeding at 1 month compared to 60.9% for the control group. Even though the percentage of those in the study group who exclusively breast fed was lower at 4 months (60.9%), it was well above the comparable percentage for the control group (5%). Moreover by 4 months only 4.2% of case infants were completely weaned compared to 34.8% of the control infants. These results indicate that continuing support for mothers who breast feed plays an key role in promotion of breast feeding. Further it is preferable if the continuing support comes from the same health worker.Participatory nutrition education and adoption of new feeding practices are associated with improved adequacy of complementary diets among rural Malawian children: a pilot study.To introduce practices for improving complementary feeding and evaluate their adoption and association with improved dietary intakes.A quasiexperimental pilot study comparing dietary intakes from complementary foods among three intervention communities and one control community before and after the intervention, and adoption of new complementary feeding practices among intervention communities following the intervention.Rural subsistence communities in southern Malawi, Central Africa.Mothers and their children aged 6 to 23 months receiving complementary foods.A participatory, nutrition education intervention based on four locally adapted lessons for complementary feeding practices designed to increase: (i) total complementary food intake; (ii) energy and nutrient density of the complementary diet, and; (iii) iron and zinc bioavailability of the complementary diet.Adoption rates for the four practices ranged from 25% for preparation of enriched porridges, to 10% for preparing soaked, pounded maize. The amount of complementary foods (g/day) and intakes of energy, animal protein, niacin, riboflavin, calcium, iron, and zinc, but not vitamin A, were significantly greater (P<0.05) in the intervention compared to control group, as were the energy, iron, and riboflavin density, and the estimated amount of bioavailable iron and zinc.Several intervention practices were well accepted and adopted and were associated with improved adequacy of energy and nutrient intakes from the complementary diet. Such improvements were attributed mainly to greater total intakes and, to a lesser extent, enhanced dietary quality of the complementary foods.Effectiveness of a community-based responsive feeding programme in rural Bangladesh: a cluster randomized field trial.Responsive complementary feeding, whereby the mother feeds her child in response to child cues of hunger state and psychomotor abilities, is a problem in some countries, and likely contributes to malnutrition. Interventions are needed to evaluate whether promoting responsive feeding would add any benefit. Using a cluster randomized field trial, we evaluated a six-session educational programme that emphasized practice of two key behaviours, namely child self-feeding and maternal responsiveness. One hundred mothers and their 12- to 24-month-olds attended the sessions as part of village clusters randomly assigned to the intervention group. A similar number of controls received sessions on foods to feed and nutritional disorders. Outcomes assessed at pre-test, 2-week post-intervention and again 5-months post-intervention included weight, mouthfuls of food taken, self-feeding and maternal responsiveness. Research assistants, blind to group assignment, observed and coded mother and child behaviours during the midday meal. Secondary measures included foods fed and feeding messages recalled. Analysis was based on intention to treat and accounted for clustering. Only 10% of each group was lost to follow-up. Weight (d = 0.28), weight gain (d = 0.48) and child self-feeding (d = 0.30) were significantly higher in the responsive feeding group. Mouthfuls of food eaten and maternal responsiveness were not significantly increased by the intervention. Mothers in the intervention gave their children more vegetables, and spontaneously recalled more feeding messages at the 5-month follow-up. These results provide evidence that self-feeding and weight gain can improve by targeting specific behaviours, while maternal responsiveness may require more intensive strategies.Community-based nutrition education for improving infant growth in rural Karnataka.To evaluate a nutrition education intervention designed to improve infant growth and feeding practices.An intervention study using monthly nutrition education delivered by locally trained counsellors targeted at caregivers of infants aged 5-11 months. Comparison of outcomes for 2 groups--one non-intervention group of infants enrolled in 1997 that did not receive the intervention in the first year of life, and an intervention group of infants enrolled 1998-1999 that received the nutrition education.11 randomly selected and 2 purposively selected villages of south Karnataka.138 Infants (n = 69 intervention) aged 5-11 months.Families were administered a monthly questionnaire on feeding and child care behavior, and study infants were weighed at this time, using the SECA solar scales, developed for UNICEF. Logistic regression was used to examine differences between intervention and non-intervention infants in infant feeding behavior outcomes.Statistically significant improvement was found in weight velocity for female infants in the intervention group. These infants were also more likely to exhibit at least four positive feeding behaviors--intervention infants had a higher mean daily feeding frequency (more likely to be fed solids at least four times a day (OR = 4.35, 95% CI = 1.96, 10.00), higher dietary diversity (more likely to receive a more diverse diet OR = 3.23, 95% CI = 1.28, 7.69), and were more likely to be fed foods suggested by the counsellors such as bananas (OR = 10.00, 95% = 2.78, 33.3) compared to non-intervention infants.Nutrition education and counselling was significantly associated with increased weight velocity among girls and improved feeding behavior among both boys and girls. These results provide further evidence that community-based nutrition programs that emphasise appropriate feeding and care behavior can be used to prevent and address early childhood malnutrition in poor households.Effectiveness of facility-based personalized maternal nutrition counseling in improving child growth and morbidity up to 18 months: A cluster-randomized controlled trial in rural Burkina Faso.The period from conception to 24 months of age is a crucial window for nutrition interventions. Personalized maternal counseling may improve childbirth outcomes, growth, and health. We assessed the effectiveness of facility-based personalized maternal nutrition counseling (from pregnancy to 18 months after birth) in improving child growth and health in rural Burkina Faso. We conducted a paired cluster randomized controlled trial in a rural district of Burkina Faso with 12 primary health centers (clusters). Healthcare providers in the intervention centers received patient-centered communication and nutrition counseling training. Pregnant women in the third trimester living in the center catchment areas and intending to stay for the next 2 years were prospectively included. We followed 2253 mother-child pairs quarterly until the child was aged 18 months. Women were interviewed about counseling experiences, dietary practices during pregnancy, and their child's feeding practices and morbidity history. Anthropometric measurements were taken at each visit using standardized methods. The primary outcomes were the cumulative incidence of wasting, and changes in child weight-for-height z-score (WHZ). Secondary outcomes were the women's prenatal dietary practices, early breastfeeding practices, exclusive breastfeeding, timely introduction of complementary food, child's feeding frequency and dietary diversity, children's mean birth weight, endpoint prevalence of stunting, and cumulative incidence of diarrhea, fever, and acute respiratory infection. All analyses were by intention-to-treat using mixed effects models. The intervention and control arms each included six health centers. Mothers in the intervention arm had a significantly higher exposure to counseling with 11.2% for breastfeeding techniques to 75.7% for counseling on exclusive breastfeeding. Mothers of infants below 6 months of age in the intervention arm were more likely to exclusively breastfeed (54.3% vs 42.3%; Difference of Proportion (DP) 12.8%; 95% CI: 2.1, 23.6; p = 0.020) as compared to the control arm. Between 6 and 18 months of age, more children in the intervention arm benefited from the required feeding frequency (68.8% vs 53.4%; DP 14.1%; 95% CI: 9.0, 19.2; p<0.001) and a larger proportion had a minimum dietary diversity (28.6% vs 22.0%; DP 5.9%; 95% CI: 2.7, 9.2; p<0.001). Birth weight of newborns in the intervention arm was on average 84.8 g (p = 0.037) larger compared to the control arm. However, we found no significant differences in child anthropometry or morbidity between study arms. Facility-based personalized maternal nutrition counseling was associated with an improved prenatal dietary practices, Infant and Young Child Feeding practices, and child birth weight. Complementary strategies are warranted to obtain meaningful impact on child growth and morbidity. This includes strategies to ensure good coverage of facility-based services and effective nutrition/care practices in early childhood.Home and videotape intervention delays early complementary feeding among adolescent mothers.The American Academy of Pediatrics, the Special Supplemental Nutrition Program for Women, Infants, and Children (WIC), and the World Health Organization recommend that infants receive only breast milk or formula for the first 4 to 6 months of life, followed by the introduction of complementary foods. Despite these recommendations, many infants, particularly those with adolescent mothers, receive solid foods (often cereal mixed with formula in a bottle) and liquids other than formula or breast milk in the first few weeks of life. Decisions on early feeding are often guided by grandmothers and influenced by beliefs that infants need complementary food to counteract signals of hunger, reduce crying, and sleep through the night.This investigation evaluated the efficacy of an intervention to delay the early introduction of complementary feeding among first-time, black, adolescent mothers living in multigenerational households. The intervention focused on reducing the cultural barriers to the acceptance of the recommendations of the American Academy of Pediatrics, WIC, and World Health Organization on complementary feeding by highlighting 3 topics: 1) recognition of infants' cues; 2) nonfood strategies for managing infant behavior; and 3) mother-grandmother negotiation strategies. The intervention was delivered through a mentorship model in which a videotape made by an advisory group of black adolescent mothers was incorporated into a home-visiting program and evaluated through a randomized, controlled trial.One hundred eighty-one first-time, low-income, black mothers <18 years old, living in multigenerational households were recruited from 3 urban hospitals. Infants were born at term, with birth weight appropriate for gestational age and no congenital problems. Shortly after delivery, mothers and grandmothers completed a baseline assessment and mothers were randomized into an intervention or control group. Intervention group mothers received home visitation every other week for 1 year. At 3 months, a subset of 121 adolescent mothers reported on their infant's intake through a food frequency questionnaire. Mothers who fed their infant only breast milk, formula, or water were classified as optimal feeders. Mothers who provided complementary foods other than breast milk, formula, or water were classified as less optimal feeders.Sixty-one percent of the infants received complementary foods before 3 months old. Multivariate hierarchical logistic regression was used to evaluate the determinants of being in the optimal versus less optimal feeders group. After controlling for infant age and family income, mothers of infants in the optimal feeders group were more likely to report accurate messages from WIC regarding the timing of complementary food and nearly 4 times more likely to be in the intervention group. The most common complementary food was cereal mixed with formula in the bottle.The success of this relatively brief intervention demonstrates the importance of using ecological theory and ethnographic research to design interventions that enable participants to alter their behavior in the face of contradictory cultural norms. The intervention focused on interpreting infants' cues, nonfood methods of managing infant behavior, and mother-grandmother negotiations. It was delivered through methods that were familiar and acceptable to adolescent mothers-a mentorship model incorporating home visits and videotape. The skill-oriented aspects of the intervention delivered in a culturally sensitive context may have enabled the young mothers to follow the guidelines that they received from WIC and from their pediatricians. Strategies, such as those used in this intervention, may be effective in promoting other caregiving recommendations, thereby enabling providers to meet the increasing demands from parents for advice regarding children's early growth and development.Evaluation of an intervention to promote protective infant feeding practices to prevent childhood obesity: outcomes of the NOURISH RCT at 14 months of age and 6 months post the first of two intervention modules.To evaluate a universal obesity prevention intervention, which commenced at infant age 4-6 months, using outcome data assessed 6 months after completion of the first of two intervention modules and 9 months from baseline.Randomised controlled trial of a community-based early feeding intervention.Six hundred and ninety-eight first-time mothers (mean age 30±5 years) with healthy term infants (51% male) aged 4.3±1.0 months at baseline. Mothers and infants were randomly allocated to self-directed access to usual care or to attend two group education modules, each delivered over 3 months, that provided anticipatory guidance on early feeding practices. Outcome data reported here were assessed at infant age 13.7±1.3 months. Anthropometrics were expressed as z-scores (WHO reference). Rapid weight gain was defined as change in weight-for-age z-score (WAZ) of >+0.67. Maternal feeding practices were assessed via self-administered questionnaire.There were no differences according to group allocation on key maternal and infant characteristics. At follow-up (n=598 (86%)), the control group infants had higher BMI-for-age z-score (BMIZ) (0.42±0.85 vs 0.23±0.93, P=0.009) and were more likely to show rapid weight gain from baseline to follow-up (odds ratio (OR)=1.5, confidence interval (CI) 95%=1.1-2.1, P=0.014). Mothers in the control group were more likely to report using non-responsive feeding practices that fail to respond to infant satiety cues such as encouraging eating by using food as a reward (15% vs 4%, P=0.001) or using games (67% vs 29%, P<0.001).These results provide early evidence that anticipatory guidance targeting the 'when, what and how' of solid feeding can be effective in changing maternal feeding practices and, at least in the short term, reducing anthropometric indicators of childhood obesity risk. Analyses of outcomes at later ages are required to determine if these promising effects can be sustained.Effect of the INSIGHT Responsive Parenting Intervention on Rapid Infant Weight Gain and Overweight Status at Age 1 Year: A Randomized Clinical Trial.Rapid infant weight gain is associated with later obesity, but interventions to prevent rapid infant growth and reduce risk for overweight status in infancy are lacking.To examine the effect of a responsive parenting (RP) intervention on infant weight gain between birth and 28 weeks and overweight status at age 1 year.The Intervention Nurses Start Infants Growing on Healthy Trajectories (INSIGHT) study is an ongoing randomized clinical trial comparing an RP intervention designed to prevent childhood obesity with a safety control. The study includes primiparous mother-newborn dyads (n = 291) and was conducted at the Penn State Milton S. Hershey Medical Center, Hershey, Pennsylvania, in addition to home visits. Enrollment was initiated in January 2012, and evaluable population analyses for this study were conducted between April 2015 and November 2015.At 2 weeks post partum, initial intervention materials appropriate to the assigned treatment group were mailed to the participant's home. Research nurses conducted home visits at 3 weeks, 16 weeks, 28 weeks, and 40 weeks, and a research center visit occurred at 1 year. The Intervention Nurses Start Infants Growing on Healthy Trajectories curriculum included messages about infant feeding, sleep hygiene, active social play, emotion regulation, and growth record education. The control group received a developmentally appropriate home safety intervention also delivered by nurse home visitors.Conditional weight gain from birth to 28 weeks was calculated. General linear models examined intervention effect on conditional weight gain. The intervention's effect on infant weight-for-length percentiles was tested using analysis of variance. Logistic regression compared the odds of overweight status (weight for length ≥95th percentile) at 1 year as a function of conditional weight gain.Of the mothers included in the study, 246 were white (88%), 260 were non-Hispanic (93%), 210 were married (75%), and 201 were working full time (72%) at time of enrollment. The mean conditional weight gain score was lower among infants in the RP group compared with the control group (-0.18; 95% CI, -0.36 to -0.001), reflecting that the RP infants gained weight more slowly than control group infants (0.18; 95% CI, 0.02-0.34); this effect did not differ by feeding mode (predominantly fed breast milk or not). Infants in the RP group also had lower mean weight-for-length percentiles at 1 year than infants in the control group (57.5%; 95% CI, 52.56%-62.37% vs 64.4%; 95% CI, 59.94%-69.26%; P = .04) and were less likely to be overweight at age 1 year (5.5% vs 12.7%; P = .05).An RP intervention is associated with reduced rapid weight gain during the first 6 months after birth and overweight status at age 1 year.clinicaltrials.gov Identifier: NCT01167270.Impact of a strategy to prevent the introduction of non-breast milk and complementary foods during the first 6 months of life: a randomized clinical trial with adolescent mothers and grandmothers.Although the disadvantages of introducing non-breast milk and the early introduction of complementary foods are known, such practices are common worldwide.To evaluate the efficacy of counseling about breastfeeding and complementary feeding in preventing the introduction of non-breast milk and complementary foods in the first 6 months.This randomized clinical trial enrolled 323 adolescent mothers and their newborns and 169 maternal grandmothers; 163 mothers and 88 grandmothers received five counseling sessions on breastfeeding while in the hospital and at 7, 15, 30, and 60 days, and one session on complementary feeding at 120 days. Data about infant feeding were collected monthly. The impact was evaluated by comparing the Kaplan-Meier survival curves for the time of introduction of non-breast milk and complementary foods of the control and intervention groups. Median time of introduction of milk was calculated in the two groups.The survival curves showed that the intervention postponed the introduction of non-breast milk and complementary foods. At 4 months, 41% (95% CI, 32.8-49.2) of the infants in the control group received complementary foods in comparison to 22.8% (95% CI, 15.9-29.7) of the intervention group. Counseling postponed the introduction of non-breast milk, which occurred at 95 days (95% CI, 8.7-111.3) in the control group and at 153 days (95% CI, 114.6-191.4) in the intervention group.Counseling sessions on infant's first 4 months were an efficacious strategy to prevent the introduction of non-breast milk and complementary foods in the 6 months of life.Assessing an infant feeding web site as a nutrition education tool for child care providers.Determine child care providers' infant feeding knowledge, attitude and behavior changes after viewing the infant feeding Web site and determine the effectiveness of the Web site and bilingual educational materials.Intervention and control groups completed an on-line pretest survey, viewed a Web site for 3 months, and completed an on-line posttest survey; follow-up data were also assessed.Colorado child care centers.Thirty-eight child care providers.Social learning theory-based website was evaluated by child care providers in the treatment group and providers in the control group viewed a comparable website.Knowledge, attitude, and behavior changes on feeding infants breast milk, formula, and solid food; desired changes to Web site.Independent samples t tests, chi-square, and repeated measures.Changes in attitudes and behaviors from pre- to posttest occurred primarily in the intervention group (P < .05). At follow-up, no significant differences were found among the 3 time periods. Providers desired no changes to Web site or materials.Child care providers appeared to have adequate knowledge on feeding infants formula and breast milk, but not on hunger cues. Providers would continue to use this Web site in the future. Further research should determine if changes in knowledge, attitudes, and behaviors are sustained over time and how infant feeding cues are read and determined in child care centers.A responsive feeding intervention increases children's self-feeding and maternal responsiveness but not weight gain.Responsive complementary feeding, whereby the mother feeds her child in response to child cues and psychomotor abilities, is low in some countries and likely contributes to malnutrition. Interventions are needed to evaluate whether promoting responsive feeding would add any benefit. Using a cluster-randomized field trial, we evaluated a 6-session educational program that emphasized the practice of child self-feeding and maternal responsiveness. A total of 108 mothers and their 8- to 20-mo-old children in 19 clusters were randomly assigned to the intervention group and 95 in 18 clusters were assigned to the informational control group. Outcomes were assessed at pretest, postintervention, and follow-up. Research assistants, who were unaware of group assignment, observed and coded mother and child midday meal behaviors. At follow-up, the percent of self-fed mouthfuls was 47.8 +/- 42.4 (mean +/- SD) in the responsive feeding group children compared with 32.2 +/- 41.0 in the controls (P = 0.01); likewise, the number of responsive verbalizations was 6.55 +/- 5.9 in the responsive feeding mothers and 4.62 +/- 4.5 in controls (P = 0.01). Intervention mothers recalled more messages. Mouthfuls of food eaten by children and weight were equivalent in the 2 groups. Lack of change in foods eaten and small quantities may explain the similarly low levels of weight gain. These results provide evidence that self-feeding and maternal verbal responsiveness, two developmentally important behaviors, can be increased by targeting specific behaviors with appropriate behavior change strategies of modeling and coached practice. Weight gain may require more nutritional input, especially in areas of high food insecurity.Use of multiple opportunities for improving feeding practices in under-twos within child health programmes.In a community randomized trial, we aimed to promote exclusive breastfeeding and appropriate complementary feeding practices in under-twos to ascertain the feasibility of using available channels for nutrition counselling, their relative performance and the relationship between intensity of counselling and behaviour change. We also assessed whether using multiple opportunities to impart nutrition education adversely affected routine activities.We conducted a community randomized, controlled effectiveness trial in rural Haryana, India, with four intervention and four control communities. We trained health and nutrition workers in the intervention communities to counsel mothers at multiple contacts on breastfeeding exclusively for 6 months and on appropriate complementary feeding practices thereafter. The intervention was not just training health and nutrition workers in counselling but included community and health worker mobilization.In the intervention group, about 32% of caregivers were counselled by traditional birth attendants at birth. The most frequent sources of counselling from birth to 3 months were immunization sessions (45.1%) and home visits (32.1%), followed closely by weighing sessions (25.5%); from 7 to 12 months, home visits (42.6%) became more important than the other two. An increase in the number of channels through which caregivers were counselled was positively associated with exclusive breastfeeding prevalence at 3 months (p = 0.002), consumption of milk/cereal gruel or mix use at 9 months (p = 0.004) and 18 months (p = 0.003), undiluted milk at 9 months (p<0.0001) and 24 hour non-breast-milk energy intakes at 18 months (p = 0.023), after controlling for potential confounding factors. Intervention areas, compared with the control, had higher coverage for vitamin A (45% vs. 11.5%) and iron folic acid (45% vs. 0.4%) supplementation.Using multiple available opportunities and workers for counselling caregivers was feasible, resulted in high coverage and impact, and instead of disrupting ongoing services, resulted in their improvement.Promotion of exclusive breastfeeding is not likely to be cost effective in West Africa. A randomized intervention study from Guinea-Bissau.To evaluate the impact of promotion of exclusive breastfeeding on infant health in Guinea-Bissau, West Africa, where mortality rates are high, breastfeeding is widely practiced but exclusive breastfeeding is rare.At the Bandim Health Project in Guinea Bissau, West Africa, a birth cohort of 1721 infants were randomized to receive health education: promotion of exclusive breastfeeding for the first 4-6 months of life according to WHO recommendations at the time of the study. All children were followed from birth to 6 months of age.Introduction of both water and weaning food was significantly delayed in the intervention group. However we found no beneficial health effects of the intervention; there was no reduction in mortality in the intervention group compared with the control group (mortality rate ratio: 1.86 (0.79-4.39)), weight at 4-6 months of age was significantly lower in the intervention group (7.10 kg vs. 7.25 kg; Wilcoxon two-sample test: p=0.03). There was no difference in diarrhoea morbidity and hospitalization rates.Although mothers were sensitive to follow new breastfeeding recommendations, it had no beneficial impact on infant health in this society with traditional, intensive breastfeeding. There seems to be little reason to discourage local practices as long as there are no strong data justifying such a change.Food supplementation with encouragement to feed it to infants from 4 to 12 months of age has a small impact on weight gain.It is unclear whether a substantial decline in malnutrition among infants in developing countries can be achieved by increasing food availability and nutrition counseling without concurrent morbidity-reducing interventions. The study was designed to determine whether provision of generous amounts of a micronutrient-fortified food supplement supported by counseling or nutritional counseling alone would significantly improve physical growth between 4 and 12 mo of age. In a controlled trial, 418 infants 4 mo of age were individually randomized to one of the four groups and followed until 12 mo of age. The first group received a milk-based cereal and nutritional counseling; the second group monthly nutritional counseling alone. To control for the effect of twice-weekly home visits for morbidity ascertainment, similar visits were made in one of the control groups (visitation group); the fourth group received no intervention. The median energy intake from nonbreast milk sources was higher in the food supplementation group than in the visitation group by 1212 kJ at 26 wk (P < 0.001), 1739 kJ at 38 wk (P < 0.001) and 2257 kJ at 52 wk (P < 0.001). The food supplementation infants gained 250 g (95% confidence interval: 20--480 g) more weight than did the visitation group. The difference in the mean increment in length during the study was 0.4 cm (95% confidence interval: -0.1--0.9 cm). The nutritional counseling group had higher energy intakes ranging from 280 to 752 kJ at different ages (P < 0.05 at all ages) but no significant benefit on weight and length increments. Methods to enhance the impact of these interventions need to be identified.Outcomes of an early feeding practices intervention to prevent childhood obesity.The goal of this study was to evaluate outcomes of a universal intervention to promote protective feeding practices that commenced in infancy and aimed to prevent childhood obesity.The NOURISH randomized controlled trial enrolled 698 first-time mothers (mean ± SD age: 30.1 ± 5.3 years) with healthy term infants (51% female) aged 4.3 ± 1.0 months at baseline. Mothers were randomly allocated to self-directed access to usual care or to attend two 6-session interactive group education modules that provided anticipatory guidance on early feeding practices. Outcomes were assessed 6 months after completion of the second information module, 20 months from baseline and when the children were 2 years old. Maternal feeding practices were self-reported by using validated questionnaires and study-developed items. Study-measured child height and weight were used to calculate BMI z scores.Retention at follow-up was 78%. Mothers in the intervention group reported using responsive feeding more frequently on 6 of 9 subscales and 8 of 8 items (all, P ≤ .03) and overall less controlling feeding practices (P < .001). They also more frequently used feeding practices (3 of 4 items; all, P < .01) likely to enhance food acceptance. No statistically significant differences were noted in anthropometric outcomes (BMI z score: P = .10) nor in prevalence of overweight/obesity (control 17.9% vs intervention 13.8%; P = .23).Evaluation of NOURISH data at child age 2 years found that anticipatory guidance on complementary feeding, tailored to developmental stage, increased use by first-time mothers of "protective" feeding practices that potentially support the development of healthy eating and growth patterns in young children.[Effects of nutritional education on improvement of nutritional knowledge of infant's mothers in rural area in China].To investigate the knowledge, attitude and practice (KAP) of young children's mothers on infant feeding and to evaluate the effects of nutritional education in the rural areas.A cluster sampling method was used to select the local health station. Five hundred and fifteen mothers, who had infants with age of 4 - 6 months, were recruited for the questionnaire survey on the nutritional knowledge in rural areas of Tianjin municipality. The mothers were randomly divided into intervention group I (160), intervention group II (180) and control group (175). The mothers in the intervention group I were educated with feeding guideline on infants and young children and had had Group lectures and advisory from experts about maternal and child nutrition for teaching them how to feed their children; while, the mothers in the intervention group II were trained with feeding guideline on infants and young children by themselves; and the mothers in the control group received routine guidance at the local health station. The follow-up evaluation on nutritional knowledge of the mothers in each group was carried out after 3 and 6 months intervention, respectively.The educational background had significant effect on KAP scores: KAP scores of the mothers with primary education or less (8.3 +/- 2.2) were significantly lower than that of the mothers educated with high school (9.4 +/- 1.6) and university (9.6 +/- 1.8) (LSD t = 3.70, P < 0.001). After being educated with feeding guideline on infants and young children, the knowledge of infant's mothers was greatly improved and KAP scores of the mothers after intervention were higher than that of the baseline (F = 183.556, P = 0.006); the percentage of correct answer on nutrition knowledge in the intervention groups was significantly higher than that of the control group. At six months of intervention, the KAP scores of intervention group I (12.0) and intervention group II (11.6) were higher than that of the control group (10.5) (LSD t = 5.96, P < 0.001; LSD t = 4.25, P < 0.001).Providing nutritional and health education to the infant's mothers should be helpful for improving infant's feeding pattern and ensuring the adequate growth and development of infants.Effectiveness of an educational intervention delivered through the health services to improve nutrition in young children: a cluster-randomised controlled trial.Malnutrition is the underlying cause of half of child mortality. Many programmes attempt to remedy this issue but there is a lack of evidence on effective ways to decrease child malnutrition.We did a cluster-randomised trial of an educational intervention in a poor periurban area (ie, shanty town) of Peru. Guided by formative research, the intervention aimed to enhance the quality and coverage of existing nutrition education and to introduce an accreditation system in six government health facilities compared with six control facilities. The primary outcome measure was growth that was measured by weight, length, and Z scores for weight-for-age and length-for-age at age 18 months. Main secondary outcomes were the percentage of children receiving recommended feeding practices and the 24-h dietary intake of energy, iron, and zinc from complementary food at ages 6, 9, 12, and 18 months. Analysis was by intention to treat.We enrolled a birth cohort of 187 infants from the catchment areas of intervention centres and 190 from control areas. Caregivers in intervention areas were more likely to report receiving nutrition advice from the health service than were caregivers in control health facilities (16 [52%] of 31 vs 9 [24%] of 37, p=0.02). At 6 months more babies in intervention areas were fed nutrient-dense thick foods at lunch (a recommended complementary feeding practice) than were controls (48 [31%] of 157 vs 29 [20%] of 147; difference between groups 19 [11%], p=0.03). Fewer children in intervention areas failed to meet dietary requirements for energy (8 months: 30 [18%] of 170 vs 45 [27%] of 167, p=0.04; 12 months: 64 [38%] of 168 vs 82 [49%] of 167, p=0.043), iron (8 months: 155 [91%] of 170 vs 161 [96%] of 167, 9 months: 152 [93%] of 163 vs 165 [99%] of 166, p=0.047), and zinc (9 months: 125 [77%] of 163 vs 145 [87%] of 166, p=0.012) than did controls. Children in control areas were more likely to have stunted growth (ie, length for age less than 2 SD below the reference population median) at 18 months than children in intervention groups (26 [16%] of 165 vs 8 [5%] of 171; adjusted odds ratio 3.04 [95% CI 1.21-7.64]). Adjusted mean changes in weight gain, length gain, and Z scores were all significantly better in the intervention area than in the control area.Improvement of nutrition education delivered through health services can decrease the prevalence of stunted growth in childhood in areas where access to food is not a limiting factor.Community-based educational intervention improved the diversity of complementary diets in western Kenya: results from a randomized controlled trial.Lack of diversity is a major factor contributing to inadequate nutrient intakes among children during the complementary feeding period in many rural areas in developing countries. This has been attributed to inadequate feeding practices and nutrition knowledge among their caregivers. The aim of the present study was to assess the effect of an educational intervention on children's dietary diversity and nutrition knowledge of caregivers.Cluster randomization was applied and twenty matched village pairs were randomly assigned to the intervention or control group. The nutrition education intervention consisted of four sessions comprising of group trainings and cooking demonstrations that were conducted over a period of 5 months.Households in rural communities in Bondo and Teso South sub-counties, western Kenya.Caregivers with children aged 6-17 months receiving nutrition education.The children's dietary diversity scores (CDDS) and nutrition knowledge scores of the caregivers improved significantly in the intervention group at endline. The treatment effect on CDDS was positive and significant (P=0.001). The CDDS rate of the children in the intervention group was 27% larger than it would have been without the treatment effect. The intervention also had a significant effect on the caregivers' nutrition knowledge scores (incidence rate ratio=2.05; P<0.001). However, the nutrition knowledge of the caregivers did not have a significant effect on CDDS (P=0.731).The nutrition education intervention led to improvements in children's dietary diversity and nutrition knowledge of the caregivers.Cluster-randomized trial on complementary and responsive feeding education to caregivers found improved dietary intake, growth and development among rural Indian toddlers.Inadequate feeding and care may contribute to high rates of stunting and underweight among children in rural families in India. This cluster-randomized trial tested the hypothesis that teaching caregivers appropriate complementary feeding and strategies for how to feed and play responsively through home-visits would increase children's dietary intake, growth and development compared with home-visit-complementary feeding education alone or routine care. Sixty villages in Andhra Pradesh were randomized into three groups of 20 villages with 200 mother-infant dyads in each group. The control group (CG) received routine Integrated Child Development Services (ICDS); the complementary feeding group (CFG) received the ICDS plus the World Health Organization recommendations on breastfeeding and complementary foods; and the responsive complementary feeding and play group (RCF&PG) received the same intervention as the CFG plus skills for responsive feeding and psychosocial stimulation. Both intervention groups received bi-weekly visits by trained village women. The groups did not differ at 3 months on socioeconomic status, maternal and child nutritional indices, and maternal depression. After controlling for potential confounding factors using the mixed models approach, the 12-month intervention to the CFG and RCF&PG significantly (P < 0.05) increased median intakes of energy, protein, Vitamin A, calcium (CFG), iron and zinc, reduced stunting [0.19, confidence interval (CI): 0.0-0.4] in the CFG (but not RCF&PG) and increased (P < 0.01) Bayley Mental Development scores (mean = 3.1, CI: 0.8-5.3) in the RCF&PG (but not CFG) compared with CG. Community-based educational interventions can improve dietary intake, length (CFG) and mental development (RCF&PG) for children under 2 years in food-secure rural Indian families.